Hawaii, session 2026, HB1637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 414D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§414D-     Attorney general; authority to investigate.  The attorney general may, on its own initiative or at the request of the department of taxation, investigate a corporation to ensure the corporation is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and those of section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________